Hawaii, session 2025, SB245.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the preservation of family farms, protection of agricultural resources, and promotion of locally rooted agricultural operations are essential to the economic vitality, food security, and cultural sustainability of Hawaii. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to promote the conservation, protection, and sustainable development of the State's agricultural resources by prohibiting certain entities from: (1)  Acquiring or holding any interest in agricultural land within the State; and (2)  Engaging in farming operations in the State. This Act is intended to ensure that agricultural land and farming operations remain accessible to Hawaii residents and are used in a manner that supports community well-being and sustainable agriculture.  This Act does not seek to burden or discriminate against interstate commerce but is narrowly tailored to address legitimate state interests, including mitigating land speculation, fostering sustainable land stewardship, and preserving Hawaii's unique cultural and environmental resources. SECTION 2.  The Hawaii Revised Statutes is amended by adding a new chapter to title 11 to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Chapter limitations on ownership of and activities on agricultural land §   -1  Purpose.  The legislature declares that Hawaii has a compelling interest in ensuring the long-term sustainability and viability of its agricultural sector, which is vital to the State's economy, food security, and rural communities. This chapter is narrowly tailored to address these interests without discriminating against interstate commerce or imposing undue burdens on entities engaged in lawful agricultural activities.  The provisions of this chapter shall apply equally to all entities regardless of their state of origin, ensuring fairness and compliance with constitutional requirements. This chapter shall not be construed to prohibit entities or individuals from participating in agricultural production or ownership; provided that they comply with the requirements of this chapter, ensuring the same rights and obligations apply uniformly to in-state and out-of-state entities. §   -2  Definitions.  As used in this chapter: "Agricultural land" means any real property classified as an agricultural district pursuant to section 205-2. "Department" means the department of agriculture. "Exempt entity" means a registered nonprofit organization operating under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, that owns or leases agricultural land for purposes aligned with its demonstrated primary mission to support agriculture, education, or community development. "Farming" means the cultivation of crops, raising of livestock or aquaculture, or horticultural production. "Farming" does not include processing, refining, or packaging of agricultural products. "Prohibited entity" means a corporation, trust, non-resident entity, or investment fund.  "Prohibited entity" does not include an exempt entity. "Resident" means a person who resides and files income tax returns in the State. §   -3  Prohibited activities. (a)  No prohibited entity shall: (1)  Acquire or hold any interest in agricultural land within the State; or (2)  Engage in farming operations in the State. (b)  This section shall apply equally to all entities regardless of their state of origin, except for exempt entities. §   -4  Restrictions on ownership and operations.  A prohibited entity that acquires agricultural land or engages in farming operations in violation of this chapter shall divest the land in accordance with section    -8 or cease operations. §   -5  Exemptions.  (a) Notwithstanding section    -3, a prohibited entity may qualify for exemption from this chapter if: (1)  The entity's ownership is composed of a majority of Hawaii residents; provided that a majority of shareholders, members, or beneficiaries are actively engaged in farming; provided further that the entity has no more than fifteen shareholders, members, or beneficiaries; (2)  The primary business activity of the entity is farming; and (3)  The entity is not engaged in speculative landholding or investment. (b)  This chapter shall not apply to exempt entities with the exception of reporting requirements established by the department pursuant to section    -6. (c)  All exempt entities that acquire or hold any interest in agricultural land within the State or engage in farming operations in the State shall submit an annual report to the department demonstrating continued compliance with this chapter. §   -6  Enforcement; rules.  (a) The department shall enforce compliance with this chapter.  Enforcement shall be conducted in a manner that does not unduly burden interstate commerce and aligns with legitimate state interests in preserving local agricultural sustainability. (b)  The department may: (1)  Assess fines and other penalties in addition to those under section    -7; and (2)  Oversee the orderly divestiture of agricultural land pursuant to section    -8. (c)  The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including procedures for annual reporting by exempt entities. §   -7  Penalties.  Any prohibited entity found in violation of this chapter shall be subject to: (1)  A fine of not less than $50,000 for each year that the entity remains non-compliant; and (2)  Mandatory divestiture in accordance with section -8 or cessation of farming operations. §   -8  Divestiture of agricultural land; restructuring farming operations.  (a)  Beginning , prohibited entities holding agricultural land or engaging in farming operations shall have five years to comply with this chapter by divesting the agricultural land or restructuring operations to meet the exemption criteria under section -5. (b)  The department shall not grant any extensions to the five-year transition period under subsection (a)." SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval.